Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE H. INFORMATION RESOURCES

CHAPTER 91. STATE LAW LIBRARY

Sec. 91.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the State Law Library Board.

(2) "Director" means the director of the State Law Library.

(3) "Library" means the State Law Library.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.002. LIBRARY OPERATIONS. (a) The library shall maintain a legal reference facility that includes the statutes and case reports from the several states and legal periodicals and journals.

(b) The facility may be used by the members and staff of the supreme court, court of criminal appeals, the office of the attorney general, and other state entities and by citizens of the state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.003. BOARD; ADMINISTRATION. (a) The library is administered by the board.

(b) The board is composed of the chief justice of the supreme court, the presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals, and the attorney general.

(c) A member of the board may designate a personal representative to serve for him.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.004. COMPENSATION. A member of the board or his personal representative may not receive compensation for his service on the board. A member or his representative is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings or performing other official duties, to be paid out of funds appropriated to the board.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.005. PERSONNEL. (a) The board shall employ a director of the library and shall set his salary. The director serves at the will of the board and is accountable only to the board.

(b) The director may employ professional and clerical personnel with the approval of the board. The board shall set their salaries.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.006. TRANSFER OF LIBRARY MATERIALS. (a) The board by unanimous vote may transfer library books, papers, or publications to the library of the Law School of The University of Texas at Austin.

(b) The transferred materials may be recalled by a majority vote of the board.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.007. RULES. The board shall adopt rules necessary to ensure the efficient operation of the library.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 91.009. DONATIONS. The library may accept on behalf of the state donations of money and other property as the library considers appropriate. Money donated to the library shall be deposited in the state treasury.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 91.011. LIBRARY SERVICE FEES. The director of the state law library may set and charge a fee for services provided by state law library staff.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 5, Sec. 9.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 398 (S.B. 1491), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.